Florida, session 2026, HB4035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 67-1876, Laws of Florida,
as amended, is amended to read:
Section 5. Certification.—
(A) To obtain a certificate of competency an applicant
shall submit an application in writing to the Board containing
the statement that the applicant desires the issuance of a
certificate and the class of certificate desired on a form
containing the information prescribed by the Board which shall
be accompanied by the fee fixed by the Board. All applicants
must be of good moral character and 18 years of age or older.
(B) The application shall contain the following:
(1) Evidence in the form of affidavits from former
employers, building officials, school officials, or other
persons to verify the required experience and education.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4035 2026 Legislature
(2) A credit report on the applicant from a nationally
recognized credit agency.
(3) Any other pertinent information prescribed by the
Board by rule or regulation.
(C)(1) Examinations shall be administered held at times
and locations places within the county as the Board determines,
but there shall be offered at least one examination every 3
months. Each applicant must complete an objective written
examination that evaluates the applicant's qualifications for
certification in the category for which the applicant applies.
The examination must be tailored to the scope of work associated
with the requested certificate and must assess knowledge of
contracting and construction principles relevant to that
category. At the Board's discretion, an applicant for a
specialty contractor and journeyman certificate may fulfill the
examination requirement through an oral examination. An
applicant must achieve a passing grade on all required exams
prior to being eligible for Board certification A maximum of
four examinations in a category may be taken in a 12-month
period, but examinations may not be rescheduled until 60 days
have elapsed. Each applicant shall take an objective written
examination about his fitness for a certificate in the category
for which application is made. There shall be a type of
examination for each of the categories which shall apply to the
type of work covered by the certificate applied for. The
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4035 2026 Legislature
examination shall cover knowledge of basic principles of
contracting and construction applicable to the category for
which a certificate is requested. The Board may authorize
applicants for specialty contractors and journeymen certificates
to complete the examination requirements by taking and passing
an oral examination.
(2) A passing grade on the examination is 75 percent.
(D) Upon Following receipt of the required fee and a
complete application, the Board shall review investigate the
applicant's qualifications, including the applicant's financial
responsibility, credit history reputation, education,
examination, experience, and business reputation, and the
business reputation of any business agency on behalf of which
the applicant proposes to engage in contracting. The review must
also include any business entity that the applicant represents
in contracting activities. If the applicant achieves a passing
score on the examination and satisfies all other requirements,
the Board shall confirm to the applicant the Board's readiness
If the applicant is approved by the Board the applicant shall be
notified to appear for an examination. Within 30 days from the
date of the examination, the Board shall inform the applicant in
writing whether or not he has qualified, and, if the applicant
has qualified, that it is ready to issue the appropriate a
certificate in the category for which application was made,
subject to the applicant's compliance with any additional
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4035 2026 Legislature
provisions outlined in the requirements of subsection (F) of
this section.
(E) Applicants who contract in violation of this act
before certification by the Board or passing the examination may
be disqualified upon a majority vote of the Board. Applicants
violating examination and examination review rules such as
unauthorized removal of examinations or questions from exam
room, or cheating during examinations also may be disqualified
by a majority vote of the Board.
(F) As a prerequisite to issuance of a certificate, the
Board shall require the applicant to submit satisfactory
evidence that he has obtained public liability insurance and a
license bond in amounts to be determined by the Board. The
certificate shall then be issued forthwith, but this subsection
does not apply to the issuance or renewal of inactive
certificates.
(G) If an applicant for an original certificate, after
having been notified to do so, does not appear for examination
within 60 days from the date of filing his application, the fee
paid by him shall be credited to the Board as an earned fee. New
application for a certificate shall be accompanied by another
application fee fixed by the Board.
(H) When a certificate holder desires to engage in
contracting in any area of the county, within or without a
100 municipality, as a prerequisite therefore, he shall only be
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4035 2026 Legislature
101 required to exhibit to the local building official, tax
102 collector, or other person in charge of the issuance of licenses
103 and building permits in the area, evidence of holding a current
104 certificate accompanied by the fee for the occupational license
105 and building permit required of other persons.
106 (I) A certified journeyman shall only be required to hold
107 a current certificate of competency in order to engage in his
108 trade as a journeyman in any municipality or unincorporated area
109 within Palm Beach County.
110 (J) The certificate shall not be transferable.
111 (K) The Board may adopt rules prescribing procedures for
112 the certification of contractors and journeymen by reciprocal
113 agreement.
114 (L) Upon the effective date of this act, any person
115 licensed or otherwise permitted to engage in business as a
116 contractor by reciprocal agreements in any municipality or any
117 unincorporated area of Palm Beach County may continue to engage
118 in business as a contractor in the particular municipality or
119 municipalities or unincorporated areas of Palm Beach County in
120 which he is presently engaged in business without taking the
121 examination under this act, but he shall not be permitted to
122 engage in business as a contractor in other areas of Palm Beach
123 County unless he first obtains a certificate from the Board or
124 satisfies the requirements of such municipality or
125 unincorporated area.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4035 2026 Legislature
126 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4035 -01-er